Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,129
Action by claimant against incumbent of office; judgment for plaintiff; delivery of books and papers.

The court, after such judgment, shall order the defendant to deliver over all books and papers in his custody or under his control belonging to said office.

R.S.1867, Code § 712, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 8336;

C.S.1922, § 9288;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,120;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,129.